Arkansas, session 2025, SB342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-19-102 is amended to read as follows:
20-19-102. Injuries to domesticated animals by dogs — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “domesticated animals” includes, but
is not limited to, without limitation sheep, goats, cattle, swine, and
poultry, and other livestock.
(2) A person owning or having in possession or under control a
dog is liable for damages to the owner or owners of a domesticated animal
killed or injured by the dog for the full value of the domesticated animal
killed or injured.
(b)(1) A person engaged in raising domesticated animals or owning
domesticated animals who sustains a loss or damage to any of his or her
domesticated animals by a dog has a right of action against the owner,
possessor, or controller of the dog.
(2) A person knowing that a dog has killed or is about to catch,
injure, or kill a domesticated animal has the right to kill the dog, without
*CRH138*
03-13-2025 14:01:13 CRH138

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB342
liability to the owner of the dog.
(c)(1) The person sustaining loss or damage under subsection (b) of
this section and desiring remuneration may go before file a complaint with
the circuit court or district court having jurisdiction where the loss or
damage occurred as permitted by the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure and
allege the:
(A) loss Loss or damage sustained, the;
(B) value Value of the loss or damage, and the identity;
and
(C) Identity of the dog and the dog's owner, possessor, or
controller by filing a complaint with the circuit court or district court
having jurisdiction as permitted by the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure,.
(2) The circuit court or district court having jurisdiction
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section which under the rules may issue:
(A) Issue a summons to the defendant to appear in the
circuit court or district court having jurisdiction and answer the
allegations.; and
(B) Award the plaintiff treble the damages or loss in
subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section.

/s/A. Clark















03-13-2025 14:01:13 CRH138